Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-613
Department of Transportation; construction contracts authorized.

The Department of Transportation shall be authorized to enter into contracts for the construction of such viaduct or subway, in accordance with such plans and specifications, immediately upon the approval by the voters of such issuing of bonds.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 34, § 13, p. 199;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1913;

R.S.1943, § 18-613;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 80.